Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 19. Food Technology Laboratory

§ 57-19-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Food Technology Laboratory Law of 1968.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-61; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares:

That the economic progress of Mississippi depends in large measure upon the wise and most feasible use of our agricultural land, and other natural resources of the state;

That food and food products grown and produced in this state substantially utilize a portion of our agricultural lands and other natural resources;

That food and food products when continually improved and more effectively utilized can contribute substantially to the total economic development of Mississippi;

That there is a tremendous need for additional knowledge about the production, harvesting, handling, grading, preparing, processing, storing, shipping and merchandising of food and food products; and

That this chapter is specifically designed to establish a program for the discovery and dissemination of knowledge concerning food and food products and the uses thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-62; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-5.
Establishment of laboratory.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is hereby authorized and directed to establish a food technology program at Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science under the direction of the president and such other administrative authorities within the university as said board of trustees may determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-63; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-7.
Provisions of buildings, personnel, supplies, etc., for laboratory.

The board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning shall provide for such food technology laboratory, such building, pilot processing facilities, personnel, supplies, and services as it shall determine to be necessary for the proper operation and maintenance of the food technology program, having due regard for the contributory facilities and programs already existing at Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-64; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-9.
Functions.

It shall be the function of the laboratory to conduct a program of research which will provide solutions to problems of the food industry in Mississippi as well as some basic research which is primarily concerned with the development of new knowledge in food science, and to disseminate its findings to the public through classroom teaching and through an active extension program which will be available to all individuals and agencies for whom such knowledge will be helpful and useful.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-65; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-11.
Acceptance of contributions, donations, gifts and grants.

In addition to appropriations made by the Mississippi Legislature for the operation and support of the laboratory, the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning is authorized and empowered to receive contributions, donations, gifts and grants of money and/or property, equipment, materials or manpower from persons, foundations, trust funds, corporations, organizations, the federal government or any subdivision thereof, the state government or any subdivision thereof, to be expended by said board in carrying out the purposes and objectives of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-66; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).

§ 57-19-13.
Cooperation with other state agencies.

The laboratory personnel shall fully cooperate with the State Department of Agriculture, with the Mississippi Department of Economic Development, with the University Research Center, with the colleges and universities of the state, and with other various departments of state government in an effort to fully effectuate the purposes of this chapter. All state agencies and departments are hereby authorized and directed to give the laboratory and its personnel their full cooperation in every possible manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-67; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-19-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 402, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

§57-19-15. [Codes, 1942, § 6699-68; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).]

§ 57-19-17.
Conduct of research on contractual basis for industries, governmental agencies, etc.

The laboratory personnel may, at their discretion, and subject to the approval of the proper administrative authorities at Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science, do research on a contract or project basis for industries, governmental agencies, public or private organizations or corporations, or any other, at a price and on a basis to be determined by the aforesaid personnel. The proceeds derived from such research projects shall be used, in addition to other funds provided therefor, for the operation and support of the laboratory.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6699-69; Laws, 1968, ch. 239, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 29, 1968).